Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2163.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) The provisions of this section shall be known and may
be cited as the preceptor income tax incentive act.
(b) For taxable year years 2025, and all tax years thereafter through
2029, there shall be allowed a credit against the tax liability imposed under
the Kansas income tax act for a community-based faculty preceptor if such
taxpayer conducts a preceptorship for a student. The amount of credit shall
be based on a completed hourly total that the preceptor has provided to a
student teaching during each tax year. Every completed 40 hours
precepting provided to a student shall entitle the preceptor to a $250 tax
credit. A community-based faculty preceptor may accrue tax credits
without limitation based on the number of completed 40 hours that the
preceptor completes during the tax year. A preceptor shall not accrue credit
if such preceptor or such preceptor's employer is compensated by another
organization for the same preceptorship.
(c) Every preceptor claiming a tax credit under this section shall

HB 2163—Am. by HC 2
certify with the director of taxation the number of hours of instruction and
the amount of the tax credit claimed in each tax year. The preceptor shall
also certify that such preceptor did not receive payment during such tax
year from any source for the training of any student or students.
(d) The educational institution or sponsored program of a student
receiving preceptorship shall provide a student receiving the preceptorship
an annual statement that verifies the amount of hours such preceptor has
provided to such institution's or program's students in each tax year. The
community-based faculty preceptor shall provide the director of taxation a
copy of the annual statement.
(e) The credit allowed by this section shall not exceed the amount of
tax imposed under the Kansas income tax act. Such credit shall be
deducted from the taxpayer's income for the taxable year in which the
preceptorship occurred and shall not be refundable.
(f) (1) The amount of such credit awarded to a taxpayer in a
taxable year pursuant to this section shall not exceed $750.
(2) The total amount of credits allowed under this section for each
taxable year shall not exceed $50,000.
(g) As used in this section:
(1) "Community-based faculty preceptor" or "preceptor" means an
individual who is a nursing home administrator, registered nurse or
registered dietitian and licensed as such by this state.
(2) "Postsecondary institution" means any not-for-profit institution of
postsecondary education with its main campus or principal place of
operation in Kansas that offers a promise eligible program, is operated
independently and not controlled or administered by any state agency or
subdivision of the state, maintains open enrollment and is accredited by a
nationally recognized accrediting agency for higher education in the
United States.
(3) "Preceptorship" means an uncompensated mentoring experience
in which a community-based faculty preceptor provides a program of
personalized instruction, training and supervision to a Kansas board of
regents student or a student of a postsecondary institution.
(4) "Student" means an individual participating in a postsecondary
institution or as a sponsor a sponsored program as defined in K.S.A. 65-
3501, and amendments thereto, that provides a training program for the
training of nursing home administrator, registered nurse or certified dietary
manager.
(5) "Sponsored program" means the same as "sponsor" as
defined in K.S.A. 65-3501, and amendments thereto.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.